Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB313.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 2.112 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The following months are designated with honor in Kentucky:
(a) March of each year is designated as "National Agriculture Month";
(b) April of each year is designated as "National Soybean Month";
(c) May of each year is designated as "National Beef Month";
(d) June of each year is designated as "National Dairy Month";
(e) September of each year is designated as "National Poultry Month"; and
(f) October of each year is designated as "National Pork Month."
(2) The week of George Washington's birthday, February 22 of each year, is designated with honor as "National
Future Farmers of America (FFA) Week" in Kentucky.
(3) The first full week of October of each year is designated with honor as "National 4-H Week" in Kentucky.
(4) March 22 of each year is designated as "National Agriculture (Ag) Day" throughout the Commonwealth.
(5) The month of June of each year is designated as "Kentucky History Month" in Kentucky.
Signed by Governor March 24, 2025.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version